Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1528.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 288.1A of Title 52, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Effective November 1, 2026, all powers, duties, and


responsibilities exercised by the Oklahoma Energy Resources Board


shall be transferred to the Corporation Commission.


B. The period of July 1, 2026, through October 31, 2026, shall


be a transitional period in which the Corporation Commission shall


gradually assume complete administration and management over the


powers, duties, responsibilities, and staff currently carrying out


the administration of the Oklahoma Energy Resources Board. During


this transition period, the employees assigned to the Oklahoma


Energy Resources Board shall continue to be employees of the Board


unless otherwise agreed to by the Commission and Board.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 288.2, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 288.2. As used in the Oklahoma Energy Education and


Marketing Act, Section 288.1 et seq. of this title:


1. “Board” means the Oklahoma Energy Resources Board “Abandoned


well” means a well that is described and listed in a report


published by the Corporation Commission identifying oil or gas wells


that have been determined to be abandoned or orphaned by the



Req. No. 3088 Page 2


Corporation Commission as a result of bankruptcy, inability to find


the owner, or for other reasons;


2. “Person” means any individual, group of individuals, or any


partnership, corporation, association, cooperative, or employee


thereof, or any other entity “Commission” means the Corporation


Commission;


3. “Independent producer” means any person:


a. who produces oil or natural gas and is not engaged in


refining or marketing of such products, or


b. who derives a majority of his or her oil- or natural


gas-related income from working interest;


4. “Major oil company” means any person who produces oil or


natural gas in the State of Oklahoma and who is a retailer as


defined in IRS Code Sec. 613A (d)(2) or a refiner as defined in Sec.


613A (d)(4) of the Code or is a subsidiary, directly or indirectly,


of a company that is classified as a major oil company as defined


herein; and


5. “Person” means any individual, group of individuals, or any


partnership, corporation, association, cooperative, or employee


thereof, or any other entity;


6. “Public education” means educational activities directed to


the general public regarding safety protocols and risk awareness


associated with oil and gas production technologies; and



Req. No. 3088 Page 3


7. “Qualified independent producer association” means an entity


in existence as of January 1, 1992, that is organized and operating


within the state, a majority of whose governing body are independent


producers and which represents the independent oil or natural gas


industry on a statewide basis.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 288.3, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 13, O.S.L. 2025 (52 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 288.3), is amended to read as follows:


Section 288.3. There is hereby re-created until July 1, 2031,


the Oklahoma Energy Resources Board which shall be subject to the


provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset Law. The purpose of the Board is


to The Corporation Commission shall coordinate a program designed to


demonstrate to the general public the importance of the Oklahoma oil


and natural gas exploration and production industry, to encourage


the wise and efficient use of energy, to promote environmentally


sound production methods and technologies, to develop existing


supplies of Oklahoma’s oil and natural gas resources, to support


research and educational activities concerning the oil and natural


gas exploration and production industry and to cause remediation of


historical oilfield environmental problems.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 288.5, is


amended to read as follows:





Req. No. 3088 Page 4


Section 288.5. The Oklahoma Energy Resources Board Corporation


Commission shall have the following powers, duties, and


responsibilities:


1. To administer and enforce the provisions of the Oklahoma


Energy Education and Marketing Act;


2. To establish an office for the Board within the State of


Oklahoma;


3. To elect a chairperson and whatever other officers may be


necessary to direct operations of the Board;


4. To employ personnel as shall be deemed necessary to carry


out the purpose and provisions of the Oklahoma Energy Education and


Marketing Act, including but not limited to an attorney to provide


legal assistance to the Board Commission, and to prescribe their


duties and fix their compensation;


5. 3. To establish and administer the Energy Resources


Revolving Fund;


6. To approve or disapprove the budget of the Board;


7. 4. To promulgate rules as it deems necessary to carry out


the provisions of the Oklahoma Energy Education and Marketing Act;


8. 5. To enter into contracts or agreements for studies,


research projects, experimental work, supplies or other services to


carry out the purposes of the Oklahoma Energy Education and


Marketing Act, and incur those expenses necessary to carry out those


purposes. Any such contract or agreement shall provide that:

Req. No. 3088 Page 5


a. the person entering the contract or agreement on


behalf of the Board Commission shall develop and


submit to the Board Commission a plan or project


together with a budget or budgets that shows estimated


costs to be incurred for the plan or project, and


b. the person entering the contract or agreement shall


keep accurate records of all of its transactions,


account for funds received and expended, and make


periodic reports to the Board Commission of activities


conducted, and such other reports as the Board


Commission may require;


9. 6. To keep accurate records of all financial transactions


performed pursuant to the Oklahoma Energy Education and Marketing


Act. These records shall be subject to an annual audit, as defined


by paragraph 4 of subsection B of Section 212 of Title 74 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, by an independent auditor and an annual report


shall be compiled and presented to the Governor;


10. 7. To cooperate with any private, local, state, or national


commission, organization, agency, or group and to make contracts and


agreements for joint programs beneficial to the oil industry;


11. 8. To accept donations, grants, contributions, and gifts


from any public or private source and deposit such in the Energy


Resources Revolving Fund;



Req. No. 3088 Page 6


12. 9. To approve or disapprove the investment of any monies in


the Energy Resources Revolving Fund; and


13. 10. To keep an accurate record of all assessments


collected.


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 288.5A, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 288.5A. A. There is hereby created the Committee for


Sustaining Oklahoma’s Energy Resources which shall be under the


direction and supervision of the Oklahoma Energy Resources Board


Corporation Commission and shall be for the purpose of encouraging


new processes or technological advancements to sustain the oil and


natural gas industry in the future for the benefit of the citizens


of this state and for advancing activities to support marginally


producing oil and gas wells.


B. 1. The Committee for Sustaining Oklahoma’s Energy Resources


shall be made up of not less than twelve but not more than eighteen


members. The Oklahoma Energy Resources Board Corporation Commission


shall select one member of the Board Commission to serve as the


chair of the Committee. Except as otherwise provided, members of


the Committee shall be appointed by the chair of the Committee and


approved by a majority of the Board Commission.


2. The Secretary of Energy or a designee shall serve as a


member of the Committee for Sustaining Oklahoma’s Energy Resources.


The Secretary of Energy shall select one member of the Committee who

Req. No. 3088 Page 7


shall currently be serving on the Oklahoma Energy Initiative Board


on behalf of the University of Oklahoma, Oklahoma State University,


the University of Tulsa, or Oklahoma City University.


3. Of the remaining members of the Committee for Sustaining


Oklahoma’s Energy Resources at least:


a. four members shall be independent oil and gas


operators, of which at least one shall be from each of


the four Corporation Commission regulatory districts


as they existed on January 1, 2013, and each shall


have operations in the district they represent,


b. one member shall be an independent oil and gas


operator from Osage County and shall have operations


in Osage County,


c. one member shall be an independent oil and gas


operator selected from a list of operators submitted


by the Oklahoma Independent Petroleum Association,


d. one member shall be an oil and gas operator selected


from a list of operators submitted by the Mid-


Continent Oil and Gas Association,


e. one member shall be an Oklahoma oil and gas royalty


owner selected from a list of names submitted by the


Oklahoma Mineral Owners Association, and


f. one member shall be an Oklahoma oil and gas royalty


owner selected from a list of names submitted by the

Req. No. 3088 Page 8


Oklahoma affiliate of the National Association of


Royalty Owners.


4. With the exception of the Secretary of Energy or the


designee of the Secretary, Committee members shall serve for three-


year terms and may be removed from the Committee by a majority vote


of the Committee with or without cause. The Oklahoma Energy


Resources Board Corporation Commission may establish any additional


qualifications, requirements, or conditions it deems appropriate for


members of the Committee which are consistent with the provisions of


this section. The chair of the Committee, with the approval of the


Board Commission, shall strive to select representatives of all


facets of the oil and natural gas industry, and the University of


Oklahoma, Oklahoma State University, the University of Tulsa, and


Oklahoma City University, in addition to any other interested higher


education institutions and governmental entities charged with duties


and authority over relevant areas.


5. No member of the Committee shall receive a salary for duties


performed as a member of the Committee; however, members may be


eligible to receive reimbursement for necessary and actual travel


expenses as provided for in the State Travel Reimbursement Act if


approved by the Oklahoma Energy Resources Board Corporation


Commission.


6. Members appointed to serve on the Committee shall be


eligible to serve on any other state board or commission if the

Req. No. 3088 Page 9


member is otherwise qualified to hold such appointed office,


notwithstanding the provisions of Section 6 of Title 51 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


C. The Committee for Sustaining Oklahoma’s Energy Resources is


authorized to accept appropriations, donations, grants,


contributions, and gifts from any public or private source for the


purpose of implementing the provisions of this act section and


Sections 288.5B and 288.11 of this title. The Committee shall


deposit such funds in the revolving fund created in Section 288.5B


of this title.


D. The Committee for Sustaining Oklahoma’s Energy Resources,


with the advice and consent of the Oklahoma Energy Resources Board


Corporation Commission, is authorized to promulgate rules as


necessary to implement the provisions of this act section and


Sections 288.5B and 288.11 of this title.


SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 288.5C, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 288.5C. A. Effective July 1, 2013, all duties, assets


and obligations of the Commission on Marginally Producing Oil and


Gas Wells created pursuant to Section 700 of Title 52 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title shall be transferred to the authority


of the Committee for Sustaining Oklahoma’s Energy Resources created


pursuant to Section 288.5A of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes this


title.

Req. No. 3088 Page 10


B. Effective July 1, 2013, the terms of the members of the


Commission on Marginally Producing Oil and Gas Wells appointed


pursuant to the provisions of Section 700 of Title 52 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title shall be terminated.


C. Effective July 1, 2013, all unclassified full-time-


equivalent, part-time, and temporary employees of the Commission on


Marginally Producing Oil and Gas Wells shall be terminated.


Employees shall be paid for any accrued annual leave and may be


eligible for other benefits as provided by law.


D. Activities and functions previously performed by the


Commission on Marginally Producing Oil and Gas Wells shall be under


the responsibility of the Committee for Sustaining Oklahoma’s Energy


Resources or a successor committee as provided by law. The


Committee may organize itself, create subcommittees, or adopt


procedures as deemed necessary and appropriate and consistent with


the provisions of this act to implement the provisions of this act


and carry out the functions and duties of the Commission on


Marginally Producing Oil and Gas Wells with the exception of making


annual reports as required by paragraph 7 of subsection A of Section


701 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.


E. Monies remaining in the Commission on Marginally Producing


Oil and Gas Wells Revolving Fund created in Section 705 of Title 52


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title shall be transferred to the


credit of the Sustaining Oklahoma’s Energy Resources Revolving Fund

Req. No. 3088 Page 11


created in Section 288.5B of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes this


title for use as provided in this act Sections 288.5A through 288.5E


of this title.


F. The Committee for Sustaining Oklahoma’s Energy Resources,


with the advice and consent of the Oklahoma Energy Resources Board


Corporation Commission, is authorized to promulgate any rules


necessary to implement the provisions of this act Sections 288.5A


through 288.5E of this title. The Secretary of Energy may provide


assistance as necessary to oversee the transfer of duties, assets,


and obligations pursuant to this act Sections 288.5A through 288.5E


of this title.


SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 288.7, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 288.7. A. There is hereby created in the State


Treasury a revolving fund for the Oklahoma Energy Resources Board


Corporation Commission to be designated the “Energy Resources


Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject


to fiscal year limitations and shall consist of all monies received


by the Oklahoma Energy Resources Board Corporation Commission from


assessments received and collected pursuant to Section 288.8A of


this title, donations, grants, contributions, and gifts from any


public or private source. The Board Commission may expend funds as


provided for by law. Expenditures from said such fund shall be made


upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as

Req. No. 3088 Page 12


prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services for approval and payment.


B. 1. Of the monies collected and not refunded pursuant to


Sections 288.8A and 288.9A of this title, a minimum of fifty


seventy-five percent (50%) (75%) of said such monies collected,


including a prorated share of administrative costs incurred from the


effective date of this act, and not subsequently refunded, shall be


expended on environmental cleanup and remediation projects related


to oil and gas pollution and the plugging of wells pursuant to


Section 53 of Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes authorized by the


Board Commission from a priority list of projects submitted


maintained by the Corporation Commission or, only in the absence of


Corporation Commission jurisdiction, projects submitted by other


appropriate state agencies.


2. Of the monies collected and not refunded pursuant to


Sections 288.8A and 288.9A of this title, no more than five percent


(5%) of such monies collected shall be expended for advertising or


promotional activities.


3. Of the monies collected and not refunded pursuant to


Sections 288.8A and 288.9A of this title, no more than twenty


percent (20%) shall be expended for the purpose of public education.


4. Upon a formal finding by the Commission that all identified


abandoned wells have been plugged pursuant to Section 53 of Title 17


of the Oklahoma Statutes, the expenditure restrictions of the Energy

Req. No. 3088 Page 13


Resources Revolving Fund pursuant to this subsection shall be


modified to allow for a minimum of fifty percent (50%) of such


monies collected to be expended for the purpose of public education,


the remaining amounts to be expended as determined by the


Commission. Such public education shall address safety protocols,


risk mitigation, and environmental protection measures applicable to


any energy production technologies, including, but not limited to,


oil and gas, renewable energy, electricity transmission, energy


storage, and emerging technologies. The public education shall be


factual, non-promotional, and designed to enhance public


understanding of safety and environmental stewardship. Any public


education and advertising programs shall be subject to review and


approval by the Commission.


C. None of the monies collected and not refunded pursuant to


Sections 288.8A and 288.9A of this title shall be used for travel


expenses of any member of the Oklahoma Legislature.


SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 288.8A, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 288.8A. A. To fund the activities of the Oklahoma


Energy Resources Board Corporation Commission in carrying out the


provisions of the Oklahoma Energy Education and Marketing Act, an


assessment shall be levied in the amount of one-tenth of one percent


(1/10 of 1%) of the gross revenues received at the wellhead for oil,


natural gas, casinghead gas or condensate produced from each well in

Req. No. 3088 Page 14


the State of Oklahoma this state except for production exempt from


the payment of gross production tax pursuant to Section 1001 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. The assessment levied by subsection A of this section shall


be deducted from the proceeds of production by the person remitting


gross production tax to the Oklahoma Tax Commission pursuant to


Section 1001 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Such assessment


shall be remitted to the Oklahoma Tax Commission in the same manner


as is provided by law for the payment of gross production tax.


Provided, the person remitting the assessment may remit cumulative


amounts of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) or less quarterly. To


defray the costs of receiving and depositing the assessments levied


by this section, the Oklahoma Tax Commission shall retain Two


Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per month of the assessments received


for deposit in the Oklahoma Tax Commission Revolving Fund created


pursuant to Section 113 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The


remaining monies received by the Oklahoma Tax Commission pursuant to


this section shall be deposited in the Energy Resources Revolving


Fund.


C. The Board Corporation Commission shall be responsible for


taking appropriate legal actions to collect any assessment which is


not paid or is not properly paid. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall


not be responsible for collecting any assessment not remitted to the


Oklahoma Tax Commission for deposit in the Energy Resources

Req. No. 3088 Page 15


Revolving Fund. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall report to the


Board Commission any information it obtains regarding failure of any


person to properly pay the assessment due, including any


documentation it may have of such failure.


SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 288.9A, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 288.9A. A. Any person subject to the assessment levied


by Section 288.8A of this title may request a refund as provided in


this section of the assessment paid on production for the preceding


calendar year. Upon compliance with the provisions of this section


and rules promulgated by the Board Corporation Commission to


implement this section, the Board Commission shall refund to each


person requesting a refund of the amount of the assessment paid by


or on behalf of such person during the preceding calendar year.


Refunds will include interest earned at the rate equal to the


average United States Treasury bill rate of the preceding calendar


year as certified by the State Treasurer.


B. The request for a refund of the assessment paid on


production for the preceding calendar year must be made during the


first three (3) calendar months following the calendar year for


which the refund is requested. Failure to request a refund during


this period shall terminate the right of any person to receive a


refund for the assessment paid on production for the preceding


calendar year. The Board Commission shall give notice of the

Req. No. 3088 Page 16


availability of the refund through press releases, paid


advertisements placed in the newspaper with the largest general


circulation in each county in the state, and such other means as it


deems appropriate.


C. Each person requesting a refund shall execute an affidavit


showing the amount of refund requested, and the affiant was the


owner of the production for which the refund is requested. Each


person requesting a refund shall submit supporting evidence


demonstrating the gross revenues, net to the person’s revenue


interest, received for oil, natural gas, casinghead gas, or


condensate in Oklahoma this state. The Board Commission may verify,


principally through the use of audits, the accuracy of the request


for refund. In verifying the accuracy of a request for refund, the


Board Commission shall exercise its authority in a manner that will


reduce, to the extent practicable and appropriate, the burden on


persons providing the information to the Board Commission.


D. No company or person who requests a refund under this


section shall be eligible to serve or have a representative serve as


a member of the Board.


SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 288.11, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 288.11. A. The Board Corporation Commission may


invest, pending disbursement, funds collected through assessments


only in obligations of the United States or any agency thereof, in

Req. No. 3088 Page 17


general obligations of any state, in any interest-bearing account or


certificate of deposit of a bank that is a member of the Federal


Reserve System, or in obligations fully guaranteed as to principal


and interest by the United States.


B. The Board Corporation Commission shall be prohibited from


utilizing any funds collected through the assessment procedure


outlined in Section 8 288.8A of this act title, for the purpose of


influencing governmental action or policy, with the exception of


recommending amendments to this act the Oklahoma Energy Education


and Marketing Act, and for the purpose of obtaining state or federal


funding for the activities of the Sustaining Oklahoma’s Energy


Resources Advisory Committee.


SECTION 11. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 288.12, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 288.12. Nothing in this act the Oklahoma Energy


Education and Marketing Act may be construed to preempt or supersede


any other program relating to oil or natural gas promotion or


marketing organized and operated under the laws of the State of


Oklahoma this state or the United States. The provisions of this


act the Oklahoma Energy Education and Marketing Act applicable to


the rules shall be applicable to amendments to the rules. In the


event of the establishment of a national program for an assessment


on oil or natural gas production, the Board Corporation Commission,


by majority vote, may elect to designate up to a maximum of fifty

Req. No. 3088 Page 18


percent (50%) of the funds collected under this act to such a


national program in lieu of an additional assessment as may be


required by such national program.


SECTION 12. REPEALER 52 O.S. 2021, Section 288.4, is


hereby repealed.


SECTION 13. REPEALER 52 O.S. 2021, Section 288.6, is


hereby repealed.


SECTION 14. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3088 CN 1/12/2026 1:04:22 PM





























Req. No. 3088 Page 19